District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.08

Identification number on firearm required before sale.

(a)

No licensee shall sell or offer for sale any firearm which does not have imbedded into the metal portion of such firearm a unique manufacturer’s identification number or serial number, unless the licensee shall have imbedded into the metal portion of such firearm a unique dealer’s identification number.

(b)

Beginning on January 1, 2016, no licensee shall sell or offer for sale any semiautomatic pistol manufactured on or after January 1, 2016, that is not microstamp-ready as required by and in accordance with § 7-2505.03.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 408, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(l), 56 DCR 1365
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377,§ 2(e), 58 DCR 1174
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(k), 59 DCR 5691
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 3022(a), 61 DCR 9990

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2348.
1973 Ed., § 6-1848.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-372 designated subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 18-377, in subsec. (b), substituted “January 1, 2013” for “January 1, 2011”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 substituted “January 1, 2014” for “January 1, 2013” twice in (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “January 1, 2016” for “January 1, 2014” twice in (b).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Microstamping Implementation Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-93, March 11, 2014, 61 DCR 783).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Microstamping Implementation Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-93, Mar. 23, 2016, 63 DCR 993).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(l) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502(e) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502(e) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(k) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(k) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary amendment of (b), see § 2(k) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).
For temporary amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Microstamping Implementation Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-261, January 2, 2014, 61 DCR 324).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3022(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3022(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3022(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Microstamping Implementation Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-258, Jan. 6, 2016, 63 DCR 530).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Microstamping Implementation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-329, Mar. 16, 2016, 63 DCR 4298).